Washington statutes.
RCW 31.04.135

Advertisements or promotions.

No licensee may advertise, print, display, publish, distribute, or broadcast or cause or permit to be advertised, printed, displayed, published, distributed, or broadcast, in any manner whatsoever, any statement or representation with regard to the rates, terms, or conditions for the lending of money that is false, misleading, or deceptive.

[ 1991 c 208 s 14.]